California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 providers may include safety net clinics that provide services defined under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 14132.100. Supplemental payments made pursuant to this section to safety net clinics shall be considered separate and apart from either the Prospective Payment Service reimbursement for federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics, or Memorandum of Agreement reimbursement for Tribal Health Centers.

(e) The department shall seek federal approval of any state plan amendments it deems necessary to implement subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.600.

(a) As a component of the CalAIM initiative, on and after July 1, 2022, the department, in consultation with representatives of county welfare departments and other affected stakeholders, shall develop and make publicly available a dashboard that reflects each county’s performance in meeting the measures established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14154 and Section 14154.5.

(b) During the CalAIM term, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department, in consultation with counties and other affected stakeholders, shall develop and implement all of the following initiatives to enhance oversight and monitoring of county administration of
 the California Children’s Services (CCS) program, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code:

(1) Establish statewide performance, reporting, and budgetary standards, and accompanying audit tools, used to assess county compliance with federal and state requirements applicable to the CCS program.

(2) Conduct periodic CCS quality assurance reviews and audits to assess compliance with the standards established in paragraph (1).

(3) Assess each CCS program to ensure appropriate allocation of resources necessary for compliance with standards, policies, guidelines, performance, and compliance requirements.

(4) Determine and implement a process to inform each CCS program of, and make available on its internet website, the latest standards, policies, guidelines, and new performance and compliance requirements imposed pursuant to this section.

(5) Establish a statewide, tiered enforcement framework to ensure prompt corrective action for counties that do not meet standards established in paragraph (1), including providing technical assistance to counties on measures where performance is consistently below expectations and on any issues that may be identified to create a continuous quality improvement process prior to the imposition of fiscal penalties.

(6) Require each county to enter into memoranda of understanding with
 the department to document each county’s obligations in administering the CCS program.

(c) During the CalAIM term, the department shall convene a workgroup consisting of counties and other applicable stakeholders to develop and implement one or more initiatives designed to improve the collection and use of beneficiary demographic and contact information in administering the Medi-Cal program and other applicable public assistance programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.700.

(a) Subject to subdivision (f) of section 14184.102 and the availability of sufficient nonfederal share funds for this purpose in each CalAIM year, the department may make incentive payments, grants, or other financial support available to qualified entities or providers under the Providing Access and Transforming Health (PATH) program to support services, infrastructure, and capacity building in advancing and complimenting select goals and components of CalAIM as described in this article.

(b) The department, in consultation with affected entities and providers, shall establish the methodologies, parameters, and eligibility criteria for PATH payments pursuant to this
 section, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(c) For purposes of PATH payments made pursuant to this section, qualified entities or providers may include, but need not be limited to, counties, Medi-Cal managed care plans, designated public hospital systems, community-based organizations, county sheriffs, adult and juvenile correctional facilities, or chief probation officers, to the extent approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(d) The nonfederal share of PATH payments may consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by eligible governmental agencies or other public entities pursuant to Section 14164. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify
 for federal financial participation pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, any other applicable federal Medicaid laws, and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and in the form and manner specified by the department. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all state and federal laws. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4 or any other similar fee on the intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.800.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2023, a qualifying inmate of a public institution shall be eligible to receive targeted Medi-Cal services for 90 days, or the number of days approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions with respect to an eligible population of qualifying inmates if different than 90 days, prior to the date they are released from a public institution, if otherwise eligible for those services under this chapter and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102.

(b) Targeted Medi-Cal services made available to qualifying inmates pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be limited to those services approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(c) To the
 extent federal approval is obtained to implement this section, the department shall arrange for an independent, third-party evaluation of the hypotheses and outcomes associated with providing targeted Medi-Cal services to qualifying inmates as described in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions. The department shall post the evaluation report on its internet website following submission to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 130.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.900.

(a) Commencing no sooner than January 1, 2027, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall implement Employment Supports.

(b) Commencing no sooner than January 1, 2027, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall implement BridgeCare to provide home- and community-based services and caregiver supports to individuals enrolled in the federal Medicare Program who meet the near dual eligibility criteria outlined in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 92.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.6. Drug Utilization Under Medi-Cal Managed Care Programs [14185. - 14185.]

14185.

(a) A managed care plan, as defined in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 14093.05, that has prescription drugs as one of its benefits and that enters into a contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), shall ensure the timely and efficient processing of authorization requests for drugs, when prescribed for plan enrollees, that are covered under the terms of the plan’s contract with the department and require prior authorization from the plan, by providing both of the
 following:

(1) A response within 24 hours or one business day to a request for prior authorization made by telephone or other telecommunication device.

(2) The dispensing of at least a 72-hour supply of a covered outpatient drug in an emergency situation.

(b) A managed care plan, as defined in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 14093.05, that has prescription drugs as one of its benefits and that enters into a contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), shall permit a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in the plan to continue use of a single-source drug which is part of a prescribed therapy in effect for the beneficiary immediately prior to the date of enrollment, whether or not the drug is covered by the plan, until the prescribed therapy is no longer
 prescribed by the contracting physician.

(c) This section shall not alter or affect the terms of a contract between the department and a managed care plan regarding the responsibilities of the plan to cover prescription drugs prescribed by a physician other than the treating or attending physician of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Medi-Cal Field Medicine [14186. - 14186.3.]

14186.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14184.101.

(b) “Person experiencing homelessness,” or a variation thereof, means a person who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This may include living in shelters, transitional housing, or places not meant for habitation, like cars or outdoors.

(c) “Field medicine” means a set of health and social services developed specifically to address the unique needs and circumstances of persons
 experiencing homelessness utilizing a whole-person, patient-centered approach to provide medically necessary health care services, and to address social drivers of health that impede health care access.

(d) “Field medicine provider” means a licensed medical provider, including, but not limited to, a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or certified nurse-midwife, who conducts patient visits outside of the four walls of health facilities, clinics, or other locations, and instead directly on the street, in environments where persons experiencing homelessness might be, such as living in a car, recreational vehicle, encampment, abandoned building, or other outdoor areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 543)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14186.1.

(a) (1) The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement this article.

(2) Each section of this article shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar
 instructions until any necessary regulations are adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 543)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14186.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that implementation of this article not be duplicative of implementation of other Medi-Cal provisions, including, but not limited to, those regarding community health worker services, enhanced care management, and community supports, as described in Sections 14132.36, 14184.205, and 14184.206, respectively. It is the intent of the Legislature that the field medicine-related provisions set forth in this article coexist with those other Medi-Cal benefits in order to fill significant gaps within the health care system for persons experiencing homelessness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 543)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14186.3.

(a) A Medi-Cal managed care plan may elect to offer Medi-Cal covered services through an in-network, contracted field medicine provider pursuant to this article.

(b) A Medi-Cal managed care plan that elects to offer Medi-Cal covered services through an in-network, contracted field medicine provider shall allow a Medi-Cal member who is experiencing homelessness to receive those services directly from an in-network, contracted field medicine provider, regardless of the member’s in-network
 assignment, such as primary care provider (PCP) or independent practice association (IPA) assignment.

(c) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan that elects to offer Medi-Cal covered services through an in-network, contracted field medicine provider shall allow an in-network, contracted field medicine provider enrolled in the Medi-Cal program to directly refer a member who is experiencing homelessness for covered services, including specialist, diagnostic services, medications, durable medical equipment, transportation, or other medically necessary covered services, within the appropriate network of the Medi-Cal managed care plan or in-network IPA.

(2) The Medi-Cal managed care plan or IPA shall create referral and authorization mechanisms in
 order to facilitate the referrals described in paragraph (1).

(d) Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting with field medicine providers pursuant to this section shall have appropriate mechanisms, procedures, or protocols to ensure timely communication between the in-network, contracted field medicine provider, the Medi-Cal member’s plan or IPA, and the member’s assigned primary care provider for purposes of care coordination and to prevent the duplication of services.

(e) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide a method for a Medi-Cal member to inform the Medi-Cal managed care plan online, in person, or via telephone that the member is experiencing homelessness.

(2) The
 department shall inform a Medi-Cal managed care plan if a Medi-Cal member has indicated that they are experiencing homelessness based on information furnished on the Medi-Cal application.

(f) In the case of a Medi-Cal beneficiary who is experiencing homelessness and who receives services within the fee-for-service delivery system, the department shall reimburse a field medicine provider enrolled in the Medi-Cal program for providing Medi-Cal covered services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 543)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.8. Value-Based Incentives in Medi-Cal Managed Care [14188. - 14188.4.]

14188.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Value-based payment (VBP) strategies offer financial incentives to health care providers that improve their performance on predetermined measures or meet specified targets that focus on quality and efficiency of care.

(2) Funding pursuant to the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016, or Proposition 56, which was approved by voters at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election, is intended, in part, to supplement payments to Medi-Cal providers to ensure quality care in the Medi-Cal program.

(b) In accordance with Proposition 56 and
 subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, Proposition 56 funding may be used, pursuant to Section 14188.2, for directed payment programs or incentive arrangements in Medi-Cal managed care, including VBPs required of Medi-Cal managed care plans as designated by the department and as described in this article. The purpose of the VBPs shall be to help improve care for some of the most vulnerable or at-risk populations in the Medi-Cal managed care delivery system.

(c) Effective no earlier than July 1, 2019, the department shall implement the VBP programs described in Section 14188.1, only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained. The department shall develop the structure and parameters of the VBP programs, including designation of those Medi-Cal managed care plans that are required to participate in VBP programs. The department may modify the VBP programs to the extent it deems necessary to obtain or maintain federal approval, if needed to target spending in a manner that furthers the purpose of the programs, or based on evaluation of the programs.

(d) (1) The department shall require the designated Medi-Cal managed care plans to make VBPs to network providers that meet the requirements of the VBP programs implemented pursuant to Section
 14188.1, in the amounts, form, and manner as directed by the department.

(2) The department shall not require a county mental health plan contracted with the department pursuant to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), or a county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized in the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184) or a successor demonstration or waiver as applicable, to participate in any VBP program described in Section 14188.1.

(3) VBPs made pursuant to this article shall be in addition to any other payments made by the designated Medi-Cal managed care plans to applicable network providers for services or other performance-based incentives.

(e) For purposes of this article, “VBP” means value-based
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 64.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14188.1.

Subject to Section 14188, the department shall develop all of the following VBP programs:

(a) A VBP program that is aimed at improving behavioral health integration in Medi-Cal managed care.

(1) Designated Medi-Cal managed care plans may earn incentive payments for achieving milestones and measures through partnerships with qualified network providers that adopt a team-based care approach for individuals with serious mental health conditions or other chronic health conditions.

(2) Different levels of incentive payments may be available depending on the level of integration, using either
 a coordination or collocation approach. Partial incentive payments may be available for meeting above-minimum standards.

(3) The requirements for receiving an incentive payment and the methodology for determining the value of the payment shall be determined by the department, in accordance with this article.

(b) A VBP program that is aimed at improving prenatal and postpartum care in Medi-Cal managed care.

(1) Designated Medi-Cal managed care plans shall make incentive payments to qualified network primary care or appropriate specialist providers that meet achievement levels on selected prenatal and postpartum care measures, as determined by the department.

(2) Qualified network primary care or appropriate specialist providers may be eligible for maximum incentive payments if they meet the designated high-performance standards, and partial incentive payments for meeting above-minimum standards.

(3) The requirements for receiving an incentive payment and the methodology for determining the value of the payment shall be determined by the department, in accordance with this article.

(c) A VBP program that is aimed at improving chronic disease management in Medi-Cal managed care.

(1) Designated Medi-Cal managed care plans shall make incentive payments to qualified network providers that meet achievement levels on selected chronic disease care measures, as determined
 by the department. The measures shall be in chronic disease care areas, including, but not limited to, diabetes care and control of hypertension, using measures currently recognized for those areas in the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) or other nationally recognized measures that the department deems appropriate.

(2) Qualified network providers may be eligible for maximum incentive payments if they meet the designated high-performance standards, and partial incentive payments for meeting above-minimum standards.

(3) The requirements for receiving an incentive payment and the methodology for determining the value of the payment shall be determined by the department, in accordance with this article.

(d) A VBP program that is aimed at improving quality and outcomes for children in Medi-Cal managed care.

(1) Designated Medi-Cal managed care plans shall make incentive payments to qualified network providers that meet achievement levels on selected childhood health care quality measures, as determined by the department. The measures shall be developed using measures currently recognized for those areas in HEDIS or other nationally recognized measures that the department deems appropriate.

(2) Qualified network providers may be eligible for maximum incentive payments if they meet the designated high-performance standards, and partial incentive payments for meeting above-minimum standards.

(3) The
 requirements for receiving an incentive payment and the methodology for determining the value of the payment shall be determined by the department, in accordance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 408.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Section inoperative on July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 14188.4.)
-------------------------------------------

14188.2.

(a) The VBP programs described in Section 14188.1 shall be funded using moneys appropriated to the department for purposes of those programs in the Budget Act of 2019, or a Budget Act in a subsequent fiscal year, from the Healthcare Treatment Fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the expenditures authorized by this article are all of the following:

(1) Made in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 30130.50) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(2) Based on criteria developed and periodically updated as part of the annual state budget process, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) Consistent with the purposes and conditions of expenditures described in subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 50.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14188.3.

(a) To implement this article, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific
 this article, in whole or in part, by means of plan letters or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 50.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14188.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall only implement the payments described under Section 14188.1 for a service period during a state fiscal year subject to appropriation by the Legislature for that state fiscal year.

(b) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals and determines that federal financial participation is not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall supersede any law suspending authority for any program described in Section 14188.1. The law on suspending authority
 includes, but is not limited to, provisions under the Budget Act of 2019, the Budget Act of 2020, and enacted legislation providing for appropriations related to those acts.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that this section complies with all of the following:

(1) Made in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 30130.50) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(2) Based on criteria developed and periodically updated as part of the annual state budget process, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) Consistent with the purposes and conditions of expenditures described in subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 410.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.9. Medi-Cal Managed Care Plan Mental Health Benefits  [14189. - 14190.2.]

14189.

Medi-Cal managed care plans shall provide mental health benefits covered in the state plan excluding those benefits provided by county mental health plans under the Specialty Mental Health Services Waiver. The department may require the managed care plans to cover mental health pharmacy benefits to the extent provided in the contracts between the department and the Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 30.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14190.

(a) The department shall convene an advisory group to receive feedback on the changes, modifications, and operational timeframes regarding the implementation of pharmacy benefits offered in the Medi-Cal program. This advisory group shall be composed of organizations and entities such as hospitals, clinics, health plans, and consumer advocates.

(b) The department, through this advisory group as well as through other existing stakeholder meetings, shall provide regular updates on the pharmacy transition that include the following:

(1) A description of the changes in the division of responsibilities between the department and managed care plans as a result of a transition of the
 outpatient pharmacy benefit to fee-for-service.

(2) A description of anticipated changes, if any, to beneficiary access to prescription medications.

(c) The department shall include in the Governor’s proposed budget the fiscal assumptions for the transition of the outpatient pharmacy benefit to a fee-for-service benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 51.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14190.1.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), and no later than January 1, 2025, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall conduct annual outreach and education for its enrollees, based on a plan that the Medi-Cal managed care plan develops and submits to the department upon the department’s approval of the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s Population Needs Assessment, regarding the mental health benefits that are covered by the Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to Section 14189 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.402.

(1) The outreach and education plan shall be informed by the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s stakeholder engagement, including the community advisory committee established by the Medi-Cal managed care
 plan, and by local stakeholders representing diverse racial and ethnic communities.

(2) The outreach and education plan shall be informed by the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s Population Needs Assessment and an assessment of utilization of covered mental health benefits by race, ethnicity, language, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, and disability, and shall ensure that materials and messaging are appropriate for the diversity of the plan enrollee membership. The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall submit the utilization assessment to the department.

(3) The outreach and education plan shall meet cultural and linguistic appropriateness standards,
 in alignment with the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services, shall incorporate best practices in stigma reduction, and shall provide multiple points of contact for enrollees to access mental health benefits.

(b) (1) The department shall review the new or updated outreach and education plan submitted by each Medi-Cal managed care plan as described in this section and shall approve or modify the plan within 180 calendar days since submission, to ensure appropriate local stakeholder engagement, alignment with the Population Needs Assessment, and cultural and linguistic
 appropriateness.

(2) Implementation of a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s outreach and education plan described in this section shall be subject to approval by the department pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall publicly post, on its internet website and in an accessible manner, its approved outreach and education plan and its utilization assessment described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), excluding any personally identifiable information.

(c) The department shall consult with stakeholders
 representative of diverse racial and ethnic communities, including, but not limited to, consumer advocates, mental health stigma reduction experts, community-based organizations, and Medi-Cal managed care plan stakeholders, to develop the standards by which outreach and education plans will be reviewed and approved.

(d) Approval standards may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Outreach and education methods that include, but are not limited to, online outreach, mail, telephone, partnerships with community-based organizations, partnerships with primary care providers, and use of navigators, community health workers, and other providers trained to conduct outreach and education.

(2) Alignment
 of the culturally and linguistically tailored outreach and education strategies with the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services, utilization assessment and Population Needs Assessment.

(3) Inclusion of consumer-friendly information in existing member-facing communication channels, including the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s internet website.

(4) An independent evaluation plan to assess and improve outreach to enrollees related to nonspecialty mental health services upon the department’s approval of a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s Population Needs Assessment.

(e) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall also conduct annual outreach and education, based on a plan that the Medi-Cal managed
 care plan develops, to inform primary care providers regarding the mental health benefits covered by the Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to Section 14189 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.402.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this
 section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar guidance, until any necessary regulations are adopted.

(g) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the
 Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   (SB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14190.2.

(a) Once every three years, the department shall assess enrollee experience with mental health benefits covered by Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to Section 14189 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.402.

(b) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall adopt survey tools and methodologies that shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) Assess experience with the full range of mental
 health benefits covered by Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to Section 14189 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14184.402.

(2) Assess consumer experience in various domains, including, but not limited to, receipt of treatment quickly, how well clinicians communicate, cultural competency of providers, communication with the plan and provider, receipt of treatment and information from the plan, including information related to patients’ rights, the treatment plan and options, and the sides effects of medication, perceived improvement, overall rating of counseling and other treatment, and overall rating of the plan.

(3) Assess consumer experience in a manner that utilizes survey best practice methods for data collection and reporting, including, but not
 limited to, staff training on data collection, the legality and use of data collection, how to work with patients to improve comfort levels in sharing the data, oversampling and collection of self-reported demographic data at the individual encounter level, and the use of data through existing enrollment and renewal processes.

(c) The department shall consider, and may utilize, existing tools in order to ensure alignment with national standards and state health care programs.

(d) (1) The department shall publish reports, commencing with a report in April 2026 and once every three
 years thereafter, on its internet website on consumer experience with mental health benefits covered by Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(2) The reports shall include plan-by-plan data, provide granularity for subpopulations, and address inequities based on key demographic factors, including, but not limited to, language, race, ethnicity, disability status, sexual orientation, and gender identity, to the extent that survey response rates produce statistically valid results. The reports shall exclude any personally identifiable information.

(3) The reports shall provide recommendations for improving access to mental health benefits covered by Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar guidance, until any necessary regulations are adopted.

(f) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with
 Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   (SB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sterilizations [14191. - 14194.]

14191.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment for care or services shall be made under Medi-Cal to the attending physician under this chapter for the costs of any voluntary nonemergency sterilization unless the treatment authorization request is accompanied by the documents evidencing informed consent required by regulations of the department. In the event that the department does not require a treatment authorization request, such documents evidencing informed consent shall accompany the billing of the attending physician. The department shall promulgate regulations under this article and shall adopt a standard informed consent form in English and Spanish which is
 readily understandable to Medi-Cal beneficiaries for use by health providers performing voluntary nonemergency sterilizations.

The failure of the attending physician performing the sterilization to fulfill his obligations under this section shall not be construed as requiring the department to deny or withhold reimbursement under Medi-Cal to other providers participating in the sterilization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 220.)
-------------------------------------------

14192.

Willful failure on the part of a health facility to comply with the provisions of the regulations of the department under this article shall constitute cause for suspension as a provider of services under Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 220.)
-------------------------------------------

14193.

The department shall transmit any data acquired by it regarding willful failure of a physician and surgeon to comply with the regulations of the department under this article to the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

14194.

The department shall submit reports to the Legislature as to compliance by health facilities with the requirements of this article, 6, 12, and 24 months after its operative date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 220.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.1. Medi-Cal Therapeutic Drug Utilization Review [14195. - 14196.]

14195.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide medical assistance, including prescribed drugs, to the state’s eligible poor in a manner consistent with the provisions of the federal Medicaid Act, provided for under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). It is the further intent of the Legislature to test the effectiveness of an open formulary drug therapy program. In order to help achieve this goal, the Legislature hereby establishes an open drug formulary under the Medi-Cal program wherein a beneficiary may receive the most appropriate, most effective, and most cost-efficient drug available for the treatment of his or her
 illness. It is also the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to establish a drug utilization review system which will evaluate and enhance the therapeutic outcome of drugs prescribed for persons eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1340, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.2.
